Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-522
Service by publication; designation of newspaper.

It shall be the lawful right of any plaintiff or petitioner in any suit, action or proceeding, pending or prosecuted in any of the courts of this state, in which it is necessary to publish in a newspaper any notice or copy of an order, growing out of, or connected with, such action or proceeding, either by himself or his attorney of record, to designate in what newspaper such notice or copy of order shall be published; and it shall be the duty of the judges of the district court, county judges, or any other officer charged with the duty of ordering, directing or superintending the publication of any of such notices, or copies of orders, to strictly comply with such designations when made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Laws 1909, c. 94, § 1, p. 399;

R.S.1913, § 7645;

C.S.1922, § 8588;

C.S.1929, § 20-522;

R.S.1943, § 25-522.